Tennessee, session 114, SB1228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-6-103(c), is amended by deleting
the language "not less than twenty-five (25) days prior to the day of election" and substituting
instead "not less than thirty (30) days prior to the day of election".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1228
003268
- 1 -